Utah statutes.
54-4a-5.   Interests, relationships, and actions by employees prohibited.

No employee of the Division of Public Utilities shall, while so employed:

(1)  have any pecuniary interest, whether as the holder of stock or other securities, or otherwise have any conflict of interest with any public utility or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commission;

(2)  have any office, position, or relationship, or be engaged in any business or avocation which interferes or is incompatible with the effective and objective fulfillment of the duties of office or employment with the division;

(3)  accept any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment from any public utility or any other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the commission or from any officer, agent, or employee thereof; or

(4)  solicit, suggest, request, or recommend, directly or indirectly, the appointment of any person or entity to any office or employment with any public utility or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission.

